Colorado, session 2026A, HB1094.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 22-1-151 as
follows:
22-1-151. Colorado school district superintendents council -
creation - duties and powers - membership - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "COUNCIL" MEANS THE COLORADO SCHOOL DISTRICT
SUPERINTENDENTS COUNCIL CREATED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.
(c) "SCHOOL DISTRICT" HAS THE SAME MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 22-30-103.
(d) "SUPERINTENDENT" MEANS THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER
EMPLOYED TO ADMINISTER THE AFFAIRS AND THE PROGRAMS OF A SCHOOL
DISTRICT PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-32-110 (1)(g).
(2) THE COLORADO SCHOOL DISTRICT SUPERINTENDENTS COUNCIL
IS CREATED IN THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION. THE COUNCIL SHALL
COORDINATE WITH SCHOOL DISTRICTS REGARDING PROPOSED GUIDANCE
POLICIES DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND COOPERATE WITH AND
SECURE THE ASSISTANCE OF SCHOOL DISTRICTS IN FORMULATING,
-2- HB26-1094

COORDINATING, AND RECOMMENDING GUIDANCE POLICIES TO THE
DEPARTMENT.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SEND THE COUNCIL ALL PROPOSED
GUIDANCE POLICIES, INCLUDING REVISED GUIDANCE POLICIES, AND THE
COUNCIL SHALL REVIEW, DISCUSS, AND VOTE ON THE PROPOSED GUIDANCE
POLICIES WITHIN FORTY-FIVE DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE POLICIES FROM
THE DEPARTMENT. THE PROPOSED GUIDANCE POLICIES MUST NOT GO INTO
EFFECT UNTIL THE COUNCIL HAS TAKEN FORMAL ACTION BY A MAJORITY
VOTE ON THE POLICIES. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER AND
INCORPORATE THE COUNCIL'S RECOMMENDATIONS INVOLVING
DEPARTMENT GUIDANCE POLICIES THAT IMPACT LOCAL CONTROL.
(4) THE COUNCIL HAS THE FOLLOWING POWERS:
(a) TO MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FOR
FUNDING NEEDED TO COMPLY WITH THE COUNCIL'S PURPOSE AND TO
EXPEND MONEY IN COMPLIANCE WITH STATE REGULATIONS;
(b) TO SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS, GRANTS, AND
DONATIONS FOR USE IN FURTHERING THE COUNCIL'S PURPOSE;
(c) TO MAKE LEGISLATIVE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION AND THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY;
(d) TO MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE DEPARTMENT
REGARDING ESTABLISHED DEPARTMENT GUIDANCE POLICIES AND
PROPOSED GUIDANCE POLICIES PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS
SECTION;
(e) TO FORM COMMITTEES, AS NEEDED, TO RESPOND TO AND
ADDRESS THE NEEDS OF SCHOOL DISTRICTS; AND
(f) TO SUBMIT COUNCIL RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES EDUCATION COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE EDUCATION
-3- HB26-1094

COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, BY DECEMBER 31 OF
EACH YEAR, IF APPLICABLE.
(5) (a) THE COUNCIL CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) FIVE SCHOOL DISTRICT SUPERINTENDENTS, OR THE
SUPERINTENDENT'S DESIGNEE, WHO SERVE FEWER THAN SIX THOUSAND
STUDENTS, APPOINTED BY A STATEWIDE ENTITY THAT REPRESENTS SCHOOL
DISTRICT SUPERINTENDENTS;
(II) FIVE SCHOOL DISTRICT SUPERINTENDENTS, OR THE
SUPERINTENDENT'S DESIGNEE, WHO SERVE SIX THOUSAND STUDENTS OR
MORE, APPOINTED BY A STATEWIDE ENTITY THAT REPRESENTS SCHOOL
DISTRICT SUPERINTENDENTS; AND
(III) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM A STATEWIDE ENTITY THAT
REPRESENTS SCHOOL DISTRICT SUPERINTENDENTS, APPOINTED BY THE
GOVERNOR.
(b) THE COUNCIL MAY APPOINT THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, AS THE
COUNCIL DEEMS APPROPRIATE, IN ORDER TO RESPOND TO SCHOOL
DISTRICTS:
(I) REPRESENTATIVES OF FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES, WHO ARE NONVOTING MEMBERS; AND
(II) REPRESENTATIVES OF NONGOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES THAT
HANDLE ISSUES FACING SCHOOL DISTRICTS, WHO ARE NONVOTING
ADVISORY MEMBERS.
(c) THE COUNCIL MAY CONSULT WITH OTHER INDIVIDUALS AS THE
COUNCIL DEEMS APPROPRIATE, INCLUDING REPRESENTATIVES OF OTHER
PRINCIPAL DEPARTMENTS OF STATE GOVERNMENT, POLITICAL
SUBDIVISIONS OF THE STATE, ORGANIZATIONS WITH EXPERIENCE IN
SCHOOL DISTRICT MATTERS, OR OTHER SIMILAR ENTITIES.
-4- HB26-1094

(6) (a) THE COUNCIL SHALL SELECT A CHAIR AND THE CHAIR SHALL
CALL THE FIRST MEETING OF THE COUNCIL. THE COUNCIL SHALL MEET AT
LEAST QUARTERLY AND AT ANY OTHER TIME THE COUNCIL DEEMS
NECESSARY. A MEETING MAY BE CALLED BY THE COUNCIL CHAIR OR BY A
PETITION SIGNED BY A MAJORITY OF THE VOTING MEMBERS OF THE
COUNCIL. THE MEMBER WHO PROVIDES NOTICE OF THE MEETING SHALL
PROVIDE MEMBERS WITH AT LEAST TEN DAYS' WRITTEN NOTICE PRIOR TO
THE MEETING DATE.
(b) A MEETING MUST NOT CONVENE UNTIL A QUORUM IS PRESENT
CONSISTING OF A SIMPLE MAJORITY OF THE VOTING MEMBERS. A MEMBER
OF THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT VOTE BY PROXY.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- HB26-1094